Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2358YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 170 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 91A.5B Railroad corporation 1 employee leave to attend school-sponsored activities. 2 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âAcademic yearâ means a year as scheduled for academic 5 purposes at a school at which an employeeâs child attends. 6 b. âOccurrenceâ means a period of up to three consecutive 7 days of leave as requested by an employee. 8 c. âRailroad corporationâ means the same as defined in 9 section 321.1. 10 2. A railroad corporation shall provide an employee upon 11 request at least four occurrences of leave per academic year 12 for the purpose of attending a scheduled school-sponsored 13 activity of the employeeâs child if the activity cannot be 14 scheduled during nonwork hours. The railroad corporation may 15 require an employee to provide written documentation of the 16 school-sponsored activity before or after granting such leave. 17 Such leave shall not be taken on a federal holiday. 18 3. Before attending a school-sponsored activity, the 19 employee shall provide the railroad corporation with a written 20 request for leave at least fourteen calendar days in advance of 21 the time the employee is requesting to take leave as provided 22 in this section. In emergency situations, no more than 23 twenty-four hoursâ notice shall be required. 24 4. A railroad corporation shall have the discretion of 25 providing paid or unpaid leave pursuant to subsection 2. A 26 railroad corporation shall not discharge, discipline, penalize, 27 or otherwise retaliate against an employee solely for taking 28 leave pursuant to subsection 2. 29